hr-HR: Vrsta bobičastog voća: Acai bobice; Crni ribiz; Kupina; Borovnica; Boysenberry; Nordijska kupina; Brusnica; Bazga; Goji bobice; Peruanska jagoda; Ogrozd; Huckleberry; Planinska brusnica; Loganberry; Marionberry; Miješano bobičasto voće; Dud; Malina; Crveni ribiz; Salmonberry; Saskatoon bobica; Serviceberry; Jagoda; Ostalo
pt-PT: Espécies de bagas: Açaí; Groselha-negra; Amora; Mirtilo; Amora-framboesa; Amora-ártica; Arando; Sabugueiro; Baga goji; Fisális; Groselha; Mirtilo-americano; Arando-vermelho; Loganberry; Marionberry; Frutos vermelhos mistos; Amora-de-árvore; Framboesa; Groselha-vermelha; Amora-salmão; Amelanchier; Amelanchier; Morango; Outro
lt-LT: Uogų rūšys: Asai uogos; Juodieji serbentai; Gervuogės; Šilauogės; Boizeno uogos; Tekšės; Spanguolės; Šeivamedžio uogos; Dygliuotojo ožerškio uogos (Goji); Peruvinės dumplūnės uogos; Agrastai; Vaivorai; Bruknės; Logano uogos; Mariono uogos; Uogų mišinys; Šilkmedžio uogos; Avietės; Raudonieji serbentai; Puikiosios avietės; Medlievos uogos; Amelianchių uogos; Braškės; Kita
ru: Вид ягод: Ягоды асаи; Черная смородина; Ежевика; Голубика; Бойзенова ягода; Морошка; Клюква; Бузина; Ягоды годжи; Физалис (золотая ягода); Крыжовник; Гекльберри (черника); Брусника; Логанова ягода; Марионберри; Смесь ягод; Шелковица; Малина; Красная смородина; Малина великолепная; Ирга; Ирга; Клубника; Другое
cs: Druhy bobulí: Acai; Černý rybíz; Ostružina; Borůvka; Boysenberry; Ostružiník moruška; Brusinka; Bezinka; Kustovnice čínská; Mochyně peruánská; Angrešt; Brusnice; Brusinka obecná; Loganberry; Marionberry; Směs bobulí; Moruše; Malina; Červený rybíz; Ostružiník skvělý; Muchovník; Muchovník; Jahoda; Jiné
tr: Meyve türü: Acai çileği; Siyah frenk üzümü; Böğürtlen; Yaban mersini; Boysenberry; Kekreyemiş; Turna yemişi; Mürver; Goji berry; Altın çilek; Bektaşi üzümü; Huckleberry; Kırmızı yaban mersini; Loganberry; Marionberry; Karışık orman meyveleri; Dut; Ahududu; Kırmızı frenk üzümü; Salmonberry; Saskatoon berry; Serviceberry; Çilek; Diğer
da: Bærarter: Acaibær; Solbær; Brombær; Blåbær; Boysenbær; Multebær; Tranebær; Hyldebær; Gojibær; Ananaskirsebær; Stikkelsbær; Huckleberry; Tyttebær; Loganbær; Marionbær; Blandede bær; Morbær; Hindbær; Ribs; Laksehindbær; Saskatoonbær; Bærmispel; Jordbær; Andet
nl: Bessen soort: Açaíbes; Zwarte bes; Braam; Blauwe bes; Boysenbes; Kruipbraam; Cranberry; Vlierbes; Gojibes; Incabes; Kruisbes; Huckleberry; Vossenbes; Loganbes; Marionbes; Bosvruchten; Moerbei; Framboos; Aalbes; Prachtframboos; Krentenboompje; Krentenbes; Aardbei; Overige
bg-BG: Видове дребни плодове: Акай бери; Касис; Къпина; Синя боровинка; Бойзенова ягода; Морошка; Червена боровинка; Бъз; Годжи бери; Физалис; Цариградско грозде; Хъкълбери; Брусница; Логанбери; Марионбери; Микс от горски плодове; Черница; Малина; Червено френско грозде; Сьомгова малина; Саскатун; Ирга; Ягода; Друго
th: พันธุ์เบอร์รี่: อาซาอิเบอร์รี; แบล็กเคอร์แรนต์; แบล็กเบอร์รี; บลูเบอร์รี; บอยเซนเบอร์รี; คลาวด์เบอร์รี; แครนเบอร์รี; เอลเดอร์เบอร์รี; โกจิเบอร์รี; โกลเด้นเบอร์รี; กูสเบอร์รี; ฮักเคิลเบอร์รี; ลินกอนเบอร์รี; โลแกนเบอร์รี; แมเรียนเบอร์รี; มิกซ์เบอร์รี; มัลเบอร์รี; ราสเบอร์รี; เรดเคอร์แรนต์; แซลมอนเบอร์รี; ซัสคาทูนเบอร์รี; เซอร์วิสเบอร์รี; สตรอว์เบอร์รี; อื่นๆ
de: Beerenart: Acai-Beere; Schwarze Johannisbeere; Brombeere; Blaubeere; Boysenbeere; Moltebeere; Cranberry; Holunderbeere; Goji-Beere; Kapstachelbeere; Stachelbeere; Huckleberry; Preiselbeere; Loganbeere; Marionbeere; Beerenmischung; Maulbeere; Himbeere; Rote Johannisbeere; Lachsbeere; Saskatoon-Beere; Felsenbirne; Erdbeere; Sonstige
pl: Gatunek jagód: Jagoda acai; Czarna porzeczka; Jeżyna; Borówka; Jagoda boysenberry; Malina moroszka; Żurawina; Czarny bez; Jagoda goji; Miechunka (Golden berry); Agrest; Borówka czarna (Huckleberry); Borówka brusznica; Jagoda loganberry; Jeżyna marionberry; Mieszanka owoców jagodowych; Morwa; Malina; Czerwona porzeczka; Malina wspaniała; Świdośliwa; Jagoda świdośliwy; Truskawka; Inne
fr: Espèce de baie: Baie d’açaï; Cassis; Mûre; Myrtille; Mûre de Boysen; Plaquebière; Canneberge; Baie de sureau; Baie de goji; Baie des Incas; Groseille à maquereau; Airelle; Airelle rouge; Mûre de Logan; Mûre de Marion; Mélange de fruits rouges; Mûre; Framboise; Groseille; Mûre de saumon; Amélanche; Amélanche; Fraise; Autre
pt-BR: Espécie de baga: Açaí; Groselha negra; Amora; Mirtilo; Boysenberry; Cloudberry; Cranberry; Sabugueiro; Goji berry; Physalis; Groselha; Huckleberry; Lingonberry; Loganberry; Marionberry; Mix de frutas vermelhas; Amora-preta; Framboesa; Groselha vermelha; Salmonberry; Saskatoon; Amelanchier; Morango; Outros
sv: Bärarter: Acaibär; Svarta vinbär; Björnbär; Blåbär; Boysenbär; Hjortron; Tranbär; Fläderbär; Gojibär; Inkabär (golden berry); Krusbär; Huckleberry; Lingon; Loganbär; Marionbär; Blandade bär; Mullbär; Hallon; Röda vinbär; Laxbär; Saskatoonbär; Häggmispelbär; Jordgubbe; Övrigt
zh-TW: 莓果物種: 巴西莓; 黑醋栗; 黑莓; 藍莓; 波森莓; 雲莓; 蔓越莓; 接骨木莓; 枸杞; 黃金莓; 鵝莓; 赫克爾莓; 越橘; 羅甘莓; 馬里恩莓; 綜合莓果; 桑葚; 覆盆子; 紅醋栗; 鮭魚莓; 薩斯卡通莓; 唐棣莓; 草莓; 其他
el: Είδη μούρων: Μούρο Ασάι; Φραγκοστάφυλο (μαύρο); Βατόμουρο; Μύρτιλο; Μπόιζενμπερι; Σμέουρο της Αρκτικής (Cloudberry); Κράνμπερι; Σαμπούκος; Γκότζι μπέρι; Χρυσό μούρο (Golden berry); Λαγοκερασιά; Χάκλμπερι; Λίνγκονμπερι; Λόγκανμπερι; Μάριονμπερι; Ανάμεικτα μούρα; Μούρο; Σμέουρο; Φραγκοστάφυλο (κόκκινο); Σάλμονμπερι; Σασκατούν μπέρι; Σέρβισμπερι; Φράουλα; Άλλο
en: Berry species: Acai berry; Black currant; Blackberry; Blueberry; Boysenberry; Cloudberry; Cranberry; Elderberry; Goji berry; Golden berry; Gooseberry; Huckleberry; Lingonberry; Loganberry; Marionberry; Mixed berries; Mulberry; Raspberry; Red currant; Salmonberry; Saskatoon berry; Serviceberry; Strawberry; Other
sl-SI: Vrste jagodičevja: Jagode acai; Črni ribez; Robida; Borovnica; Malina boysenberry; Barjanska robida; Brusnica; Bezeg; Jagode goji; Inkovske jagode; Kosmulja; Borovnica (huckleberry); Jerebika; Malina loganberry; Robida marionberry; Mešano jagodičevje; Murva; Malina; Rdeči ribez; Lososova jagoda; Jagode saskatoon; Šmarna hrušica; Jagoda; Drugo
ro-RO: Specii de fructe de pădure: Fructe de acai; Coacăze negre; Mure; Afine; Mure Boysen; Mure pitice; Merișoare; Fructe de soc; Fructe goji; Physalis; Agrișe; Afine sălbatice; Merișoare de munte; Mure Logan; Mure Marion; Fructe de pădure mixte; Dude; Zmeură; Coacăze roșii; Mure Salmon; Fructe Saskatoon; Fructe de service; Căpșuni; Altele
hu: Bogyófajták: Acai bogyó; Fekete ribizli; Szeder; Áfonya; Boysen-szeder; Törpemálna; Tőzegáfonya; Bodza; Goji bogyó; Inka bogyó; Egres; Huckleberry; Vörös áfonya; Logan-szeder; Marion-szeder; Erdei gyümölcsök; Faeper; Málna; Piros ribizli; Lazacbogyó; Saskatoon bogyó; Fanyarka; Eper; Egyéb
ko: 베리 종류: 아사이 베리; 블랙 커런트; 블랙베리; 블루베리; 보이즌베리; 클라우드베리; 크랜베리; 엘더베리; 고지 베리; 골든 베리; 구스베리; 허클베리; 링곤베리; 로건베리; 매리언베리; 믹스 베리; 멀베리; 라즈베리; 레드 커런트; 살몬베리; 새스커툰 베리; 서비스베리; 딸기; 기타
sk-SK: Druhy bobuľového ovocia: Bobule acai; Čierna ríbezľa; Černica; Čučoriedka; Boysenova ostružina; Ostružina morušková; Brusnica; Baza čierna; Kustovnica čínska; Machovka peruánska; Egreš; Americká čučoriedka; Brusnica obyčajná; Loganova ostružina; Ostružina Marion; Zmes lesného ovocia; Moruša; Malina; Červená ríbezľa; Ostružina úhľadná; Muchovník jelšolistý; Muchovník; Jahoda; Iné
vi: Loại quả mọng: Acai; Nho đen; Mâm xôi đen; Việt quất; Boysenberry; Cloudberry; Nam việt quất; Cơm cháy; Kỷ tử; Anh đào đất; Lý gai; Huckleberry; Lingonberry; Loganberry; Marionberry; Quả mọng hỗn hợp; Dâu tằm; Mâm xôi đỏ; Chuỗi ngọc đỏ; Salmonberry; Saskatoon; Serviceberry; Dâu tây; Khác
es: Especie de baya: Baya de azaí; Grosella negra; Zarzamora; Arándano azul; Baya de Boysen; Mora de los pantanos; Arándano rojo; Baya de saúco; Baya de Goji; Uchuva; Grosella espinosa; Huckleberry; Arándano rojo europeo; Baya de Logan; Baya de Marion; Bayas mixtas; Mora; Frambuesa; Grosella roja; Mora salmón; Baya de Saskatoon; Baya de servicio; Fresa; Otro
nb: Bærarter: Acaibær; Solbær; Bjørnebær; Blåbær; Boysenbær; Multe; Tranebær; Hyllebær; Gojibær; Inkabær; Stikkelsbær; Huckleberry; Tyttebær; Loganbær; Marionbær; Blandede bær; Morbær; Bringebær; Rips; Laksebær; Saskatoon-bær; Søtmispelbær; Jordbær; Annet
it: Specie di bacche: Bacca di acai; Ribes nero; Mora; Mirtillo; Bacca di Boysen; Camemoro; Mirtillo rosso; Bacca di sambuco; Bacca di goji; Alchechengi; Uva spina; Huckleberry; Mirtillo rosso scandinavo; Bacca di Logan; Marionberry; Frutti di bosco misti; Mora di gelso; Lampone; Ribes rosso; Salmonberry; Bacca di Saskatoon; Bacca di pero corvino; Fragola; Altro
zh-CN: 浆果品种: 巴西莓; 黑加仑; 黑莓; 蓝莓; 博伊森莓; 云莓; 蔓越莓; 接骨木莓; 枸杞; 黄金莓; 醋栗; 越橘; 越橘莓; 罗甘莓; 马里昂莓; 混合莓; 桑葚; 树莓; 红加仑; 鲑莓; 萨斯卡通莓; 唐棣; 草莓; 其他
fi: Marjalajit: Acaimarja; Mustaherukka; Karhunvatukka; Mustikka; Boysenmarja; Lakka; Karpalo; Seljanmarja; Goji-marja; Ananaskirsikka; Karviainen; Huckleberry; Puolukka; Loganinmarja; Marioninmarja; Sekamarjat; Mulperinmarja; Vadelma; Punaherukka; Lohenmarja; Saskatoon; Tuomipihlajan marja; Mansikka; Muu
ja: ベリーの種類: アサイー; ブラックカラント; ブラックベリー; ブルーベリー; ボイセンベリー; クラウドベリー; クランベリー; エルダーベリー; ゴジベリー; ゴールデンベリー; グースベリー; ハックルベリー; リンゴンベリー; ローガンベリー; マリオンベリー; ミックスベリー; マルベリー; ラズベリー; レッドカラント; サーモンベリー; サスカトゥーンベリー; サービスベリー; ストロベリー; その他